Tennessee statutes. Title 10 Public Libraries, Archives and Records
Part 5 Miscellaneous Provisions
A voluntary association that establishes and enforces bylaws or rules for interscholastic sports competition for secondary schools in this state shall have access to records or information from public, charter, non-public, other schools, school officials and parents or guardians of school children as is required to fulfill its duties and functions. Records or information relating to academic performance, financial status of a student or the student's parent or guardian, medical or psychological treatment or testing, and personal family information in the possession of such association shall be confidential.

Job performance evaluations of the following employees shall be treated as confidential and shall not be open for public inspection:

Employees of the department of treasury;

Employees of the comptroller of the treasury;

Employees of the secretary of state's office; and

Employees of public institutions of higher education.

For purposes of this subdivision (a)(26), “job performance evaluations” includes, but is not limited to, job performance evaluations completed by supervisors, communications concerning job performance evaluations, self-evaluations of job performance prepared by employees, job performance evaluation scores, drafts, notes, memoranda, and all other records relating to job performance evaluations.

Nothing in this subdivision (a)(26) shall be construed to limit access to those records by law enforcement agencies, courts, or other governmental agencies performing official functions.

E-mail addresses collected by the department of state's division of business services, except those that may be contained on filings submitted pursuant to title 47, chapter 9, or § 55-3-126(f), shall be treated as confidential and shall not be open to inspection by members of the public.

Proposals and statements of qualifications received by a local government entity in response to a personal service, professional service, or consultant service request for proposals or request for qualifications solicitation, and related records, including, but not limited to, evaluations, names of evaluation committee members, and all related memoranda or notes, shall not be open for public inspection until the intent to award the contract to a particular respondent is announced.

No governmental entity shall publicly disclose personally identifying information of any citizen of the state unless:

Permission is given by the citizen;

Distribution is authorized under state or federal law; or

Distribution is made:

To a consumer reporting agency as defined by the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. §§ 1681 et seq.);

To a financial institution subject to the privacy provisions of the federal Gramm Leach Bliley Act (15 U.S.C. § 6802); or

To a financial institution subject to the International Money Laundering Abatement and Financial Anti-Terrorism Act of 2001 (31 U.S.C. §§ 5311 et seq.).

This subdivision (a)(29) does not prohibit the use of personally identifying information by a governmental entity in the performance of its functions or the disclosure of personally identifying information to another governmental entity, or an agency of the federal government, or a private person or entity that has been authorized to perform certain duties as a contractor of the governmental entity.

Any person or entity receiving personally identifying information from a governmental entity shall be subject to the same confidentiality provisions as the disclosing entity; provided, however, that the confidentiality provisions applicable to a consumer reporting agency or financial institution as defined in subdivision (a)(29)(A)(iii) shall be governed by federal law.

For purposes of this subdivision (a)(29), “personally identifying information” means:

Social security numbers;

Official state or government issued driver licenses or identification numbers;

Alien registration numbers or passport numbers;

Employer or taxpayer identification numbers;

Unique biometric data, such as fingerprints, voice prints, retina or iris images, or other unique physical representations; or

Unique electronic identification numbers, routing codes or other personal identifying data which enables an individual to obtain merchandise or service or to otherwise financially encumber the legitimate possessor of the identifying data.

Proprietary information, trade secrets, and marketing information submitted to any food-based business incubation service provider created by a municipality shall be treated as confidential and shall not be open for inspection by members of the public.

As used in this subdivision (a)(30):

“Proprietary information”:

Means commercial or financial information that is used either directly or indirectly in the business of any person or company submitting information to a food-based business incubation service provider, and that gives such person or company an advantage or an opportunity to obtain an advantage over competitors who do not know or use such information; and

Does not include lease agreements with the incubation service provider, the identity of businesses or persons using the incubation service provider's services, amounts paid to the incubation service provider by businesses or persons for use of facilities or for other services, or financial records of the incubation service provider;

“Marketing information” means marketing studies, marketing analyses, and similar research and information designed to identify potential customers and business relationships; and

“Trade secret” means a manufacturing process, materials used therein, and costs associated with the manufacturing process of any person or company submitting information to a food-based business incubation service provider.

[Effective until June 30, 2026.]

Except as provided in subdivisions (a)(31)(B)-(D), personally identifying information of any person named in any motor vehicle accident report is confidential and not open for public inspection.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(31)(A) and upon written request, any person named in any motor vehicle accident report, or such person's agent, legal representative, or attorney, certifying that the person has permission from the person, persons, or entities authorized to obtain motor vehicle records information pursuant to § 55-25-107(b)(1), (b)(6) or (b)(9), is authorized to receive an accident report containing personally identifying information of persons involved in the accident.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(31)(A), any federal, state, or local governmental agency, or any private person or entity acting on behalf of a federal, state, or local governmental agency, may use personally identifying information in carrying out the agency's functions.

Nothing in this subdivision (a)(31) prevents a law enforcement entity from releasing information about traffic accidents to the public, including the name, age, and county or city of residence of a person involved in an accident, when the law enforcement entity determines such release is in the best interest of the agency and for the public good.

For purposes of this subdivision (a)(31), “personally identifying information” means:

Street addresses and zip codes;

Telephone numbers;

Driver license numbers; and

Insurance information.

This subdivision (a)(31) is repealed June 30, 2026.

Any record designated “confidential” shall be so treated by agencies in the maintenance, storage and disposition of such confidential records. These records shall be destroyed in such a manner that they cannot be read, interpreted or reconstructed. The destruction shall be in accordance with an approved records disposition authorization from the public records commission.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any confidential public record in existence more than seventy (70) years shall be open for public inspection by any person unless disclosure of the record is specifically prohibited or restricted by federal law or unless the record is a record of services for a person for mental illness or intellectual and developmental disabilities. This section does not apply to a record concerning an adoption or a record maintained by the office of vital records or by the Tennessee bureau of investigation. For the purpose of providing an orderly schedule of availability for access to such confidential public records for public inspection, all records created and designated as confidential prior to January 1, 1901, shall be open for public inspection on January 1, 1985. All other public records created and designated as confidential after January 1, 1901 and which are seventy (70) years of age on January 1, 1985, shall be open for public inspection on January 1, 1986; thereafter all such records shall be open for public inspection pursuant to this part after seventy (70) years from the creation date of such records.

Records of any employee's identity, diagnosis, treatment, or referral for treatment that are maintained by any state or local government employee assistance program shall be confidential; provided, that any such records are maintained separately from personnel and other records regarding such employee that are open for inspection. For purposes of this subsection (d), “employee assistance program” means any program that provides counseling, problem identification, intervention, assessment, or referral for appropriate diagnosis and treatment, and follow-up services to assist employees of such state or local governmental entity who are impaired by personal concerns including, but not limited to, health, marital, family, financial, alcohol, drug, legal, emotional, stress or other personal concerns which may adversely affect employee job performance.

Unpublished telephone numbers in the possession of emergency communications districts created pursuant to title 7, chapter 86, or the emergency communications board created pursuant to § 7-86-302 or its designated agent shall be treated as confidential and shall not be open for inspection by members of the public until such time as any provision of the service contract between the telephone service provider and the consumer providing otherwise is effectuated; provided, that addresses held with such unpublished telephone numbers, or addresses otherwise collected or compiled, and in the possession of emergency communications districts created pursuant to title 7, part 86, or the emergency communications board created pursuant to § 7-86-302 or its designated agent shall be made available upon written request to any county election commission for the purpose of compiling a voter mailing list for a respective county.

The following records or information of any state, county, municipal or other public employee or former employee, or applicant to such position, or of any law enforcement officer commissioned pursuant to § 49-7-118, in the possession of a governmental entity or any person in its capacity as an employer shall be treated as confidential and shall not be open for inspection by members of the public:

Home telephone and personal cell phone numbers;

Bank account and individual health savings account, retirement account and pension account information; provided, that nothing shall limit access to financial records of a governmental employer that show the amounts and sources of contributions to the accounts or the amount of pension or retirement benefits provided to the employee or former employee by the governmental employer;

Social security number;

Residential information, including the street address, city, state and zip code, for any state employee; and

Residential street address for any county, municipal or other public employee;

Driver license information except where driving or operating a vehicle is part of the employee's job description or job duties or incidental to the performance of the employee's job;

The information listed in subdivisions (f)(1)(A)-(E) of immediate family members, whether or not the immediate family member resides with the employee, or household members;

Emergency contact information, except for that information open to public inspection in accordance with subdivision (f)(1)(D)(ii); and

Personal, nongovernment issued, email address.

Information made confidential by this subsection (f) shall be redacted wherever possible and nothing in this subsection (f) shall be used to limit or deny access to otherwise public information because a file, a document, or data file contains confidential information.

Nothing in this subsection (f) shall be construed to limit access to these records by law enforcement agencies, courts, or other governmental agencies performing official functions.

Nothing in this subsection (f) shall be construed to close any personnel records of public officers which are currently open under state law.

Nothing in this subsection (f) shall be construed to limit access to information made confidential under this subsection (f), when the employee expressly authorizes the release of such information.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, the bank account information for any state, county, municipal, or other public employee, former employee or applicant to such position, or any law enforcement officer commissioned pursuant to § 49-7-118, that is received, compiled or maintained by the department of treasury, shall be confidential and not open for inspection by members of the public, regardless of whether the employee is employed by the department of treasury. The bank account information that shall be kept confidential shall include, but not be limited to bank account numbers, transit routing numbers and the name of the financial institutions.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, the following information that is received, compiled or maintained by the department of treasury relating to the department's investment division employees who are so designated in writing by the state treasurer shall be kept confidential and not open for inspection by members of the public: holdings reports, confirmations, transaction reports and account statements relative to securities, investments or other assets disclosed by the employee to the employer, or authorized by the employee to be released to the employer directly or otherwise.

Any person required by law to treat information described in subdivision (f)(1)(D) as confidential commits an offense if such information pertains to a law enforcement officer or a county corrections officer and:

The person acts with criminal negligence, as defined in § 39-11-106, in releasing the information to the public; or

The person knows the information is to be treated as confidential and intentionally releases the information to the public.

A violation of subdivision (f)(8)(A)(i) is a Class B misdemeanor punishable only by a fine of five hundred dollars ($500).

A violation of subdivision (f)(8)(A)(ii) is a Class A misdemeanor.

Subdivision (f)(8)(A) shall not apply if:

The law enforcement officer or county corrections officer whose information is treated as confidential under subdivision (f)(1)(D) expressly authorizes the release of such information; or

The information is released pursuant to court order.

All law enforcement personnel information in the possession of any entity or agency in its capacity as an employer, including officers commissioned pursuant to § 49-7-118, shall be open for inspection as provided in § 10-7-503(a), except personal information shall be redacted where there is a reason not to disclose as determined by the chief law enforcement officer or the chief law enforcement officer's designee.

When a request to inspect includes personal information and the request is for a professional, business, or official purpose, the chief law enforcement officer or custodian shall consider the specific circumstances to determine whether there is a reason not to disclose and shall release all information, except information made confidential in subsection (f), if there is not such a reason. In all other circumstances, the officer shall be notified prior to disclosure of the personal information and shall be given a reasonable opportunity to be heard and oppose the release of the information. Nothing in this subdivision (g)(1) shall be construed to limit the requestor's right to judicial review set out in § 10-7-505.

The chief law enforcement officer shall reserve the right to segregate information that could be used to identify or to locate an officer designated as working undercover.

In addition to the requirements of § 10-7-503(c), the request for a professional, business, or official purpose shall include the person's business address, business telephone number and email address. The request may be made on official or business letterhead and the person making the request shall provide the name and contact number or email address for a supervisor for verification purposes.

If the chief law enforcement official, the chief law enforcement official's designee, or the custodian of the information decides to withhold personal information, a specific reason shall be given to the requestor in writing within two (2) business days, and the file shall be released with the personal information redacted.

For purposes of this subsection (g), personal information shall include the officer's residential address, home and personal cellular telephone number; place of employment; name, work address and telephone numbers of the officer's immediate family; name, location, and telephone number of any educational institution or daycare provider where the officer's spouse or child is enrolled.

Nothing in this subsection (g) shall be used to limit or deny access to otherwise public information because a file, a document, or data file contains some information made confidential by subdivision (g)(1).

Nothing in this subsection (g) shall be construed to limit access to these records by law enforcement agencies, courts, or other governmental agencies performing official functions.

Except as provided in subdivision (g)(1), nothing in this subsection (g) shall be construed to close personnel records of public officers, which are currently open under state law.

Nothing in this subsection (g) shall be construed to limit access to information made confidential by subdivision (g)(1), when the employee expressly authorizes the release of such information.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, those parts of the record identifying an individual or entity as a person or entity who or that has been or may in the future be directly involved in the process of executing a sentence of death shall be treated as confidential and shall not be open to public inspection. For the purposes of this section “person or entity” includes, but is not limited to, an employee of the state who has training related to direct involvement in the process of executing a sentence of death, a contractor or employee of a contractor, a volunteer who has direct involvement in the process of executing a sentence of death, or a person or entity involved in the procurement or provision of chemicals, equipment, supplies and other items for use in carrying out a sentence of death. Records made confidential by this section include, but are not limited to, records related to remuneration to a person or entity in connection with such person's or entity's participation in or preparation for the execution of a sentence of death. Such payments shall be made in accordance with a memorandum of understanding between the commissioner of correction and the commissioner of finance and administration in a manner that will protect the public identity of the recipients; provided, that, if a contractor is employed to participate in or prepare for the execution of a sentence of death, the amount of the special payment made to such contractor pursuant to the contract shall be reported by the commissioner of correction to the comptroller of the treasury and such amount shall be a public record.

Information made confidential by this subsection (h) shall be redacted wherever possible and nothing in this subsection (h) shall be used to limit or deny access to otherwise public information because a file, a document, or data file contains confidential information.

Information that would allow a person to obtain unauthorized access to confidential information or to government property shall be maintained as confidential. For the purpose of this section, “government property” includes electronic information processing systems, telecommunication systems, or other communications systems of a governmental entity subject to this chapter. For the purpose of this section, “governmental entity” means the state of Tennessee and any county, municipality, city or other political subdivision of the state of Tennessee. Such records include:

Plans, security codes, passwords, combinations, or computer programs used to protect electronic information and government property;

Information that would identify those areas of structural or operational vulnerability that would permit unlawful disruption to, or interference with, the services provided by a governmental entity; and

Information that could be used to disrupt, interfere with, or gain unauthorized access to electronic information or government property.

Information made confidential by this subsection (i) shall be redacted wherever possible and nothing in this subsection (i) shall be used to limit or deny access to otherwise public information because a file, document, or data file contains confidential information.

Documents concerning the cost of protecting government property or electronic information shall not be confidential.

The identity of a vendor that provides to the state goods and services used to protect electronic information processing systems, telecommunication and other communication systems, data storage systems, government employee information, or citizen information shall be confidential.

The identity of a vendor that provides to a governmental entity other than the state goods and services used to protect electronic information processing systems, telecommunication and other communication systems, data storage systems, government employee information, or citizen information shall not be confidential; provided, that the identity of the vendor shall be confidential if the governing body of the governmental entity votes affirmatively to make such information confidential.

Notwithstanding subdivisions (i)(3)(B) and (C), a governmental entity shall, upon request, provide the identity of a vendor to the comptroller of the treasury, the fiscal review committee of the general assembly, and any member of the general assembly. If the identity of the vendor is confidential under subdivision (i)(3)(B) or (i)(3)(C), the comptroller, fiscal review committee, or member shall exercise reasonable care in maintaining the confidentiality of the identity of the vendor obtained under this subdivision (i)(3)(D).

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, identifying information compiled and maintained by the department of correction and the board of parole concerning any person shall be confidential when the person has been notified or requested that notification be provided to the person regarding the status of criminal proceedings or of a convicted felon incarcerated in a department of correction institution, county jail or workhouse or under state supervised probation or parole pursuant to § 40-28-505, § 40-38-103, § 40-38-110, § 40-38-111, § 41-21-240 or § 41-21-242.

For purposes of subdivision (j)(1), “identifying information” means the name, home and work addresses, telephone numbers and social security number of the person being notified or requesting that notification be provided.

The following information regarding victims who apply for compensation under the Criminal Injuries Compensation Act, compiled in title 29, chapter 13, shall be treated as confidential and shall not be open for inspection by members of the public:

Residential information, including the street address, city, state and zip code;

Home telephone and personal cell phone numbers;

Social security number; and

The criminal offense from which the victim is receiving compensation.

All applications, certificates, records, reports, legal documents and petitions made or information received pursuant to title 37 that directly or indirectly identifies a child or family receiving services from the department of children's services or that identifies the person who made a report of harm pursuant to § 37-1-403 or § 37-1-605 shall be confidential and shall not be open for public inspection, except as provided by §§ 37-1-131, 37-1-409, 37-1-612, 37-5-107 and 49-6-3051.

The information made confidential pursuant to subdivision (l )(1) includes information contained in applications, certifications, records, reports, legal documents and petitions in the possession of not only the department of children's services but any state or local agency, including, but not limited to, law enforcement and the department of education.

Information and records that are directly related to the security of any government building shall be maintained as confidential and shall not be open to public inspection. For purposes of this subsection (m), “government building” means any building that is owned, leased or controlled, in whole or in part, by the state of Tennessee or any county, municipality, city or other political subdivision of the state of Tennessee. Such information and records include, but are not limited to:

Information and records about alarm and security systems used at the government building, including codes, passwords, wiring diagrams, plans and security procedures and protocols related to the security systems;

Security plans, including security-related contingency planning and emergency response plans;

Assessments of security vulnerability;

Information and records that would identify those areas of structural or operational vulnerability that would permit unlawful disruption to, or interference with, the services provided by a governmental entity; and

Surveillance recordings, whether recorded to audio or visual format, or both, except segments of the recordings may be made public when they include an act or incident involving public safety or security or possible criminal activity. In addition, if the recordings are relevant to a civil action or criminal prosecution, then the recordings may be released in compliance with a subpoena or an order of a court of record in accordance with the Tennessee rules of civil or criminal procedure. The court or administrative judge having jurisdiction over the proceedings shall issue appropriate protective orders, when necessary, to ensure that the information is disclosed only to appropriate persons. Release of any segment or segments of the recordings shall not be construed as waiving the confidentiality of the remaining segments of the audio or visual tape.

Information made confidential by this subsection (m) shall be redacted wherever possible and nothing in this subsection (m) shall be used to limit or deny access to otherwise public information because a file or document contains confidential information.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the following documents submitted to the state in response to a request for proposal or other procurement method shall remain confidential after completion of the evaluation period:

Discount, rebate, pricing or other financial arrangements at the individual drug level between pharmaceutical manufacturers, pharmaceutical wholesalers/distributors, and pharmacy benefits managers, as defined in § 56-7-3102, that a proposer:

Submits to the state in response to a request for proposals or other procurement methods for pharmacy-related benefits or services;

Includes in its cost or price proposal, or provides to the state after the notice of intended award of the contract is issued, where the proposer is the apparent contract awardee; and

Explicitly marks as confidential and proprietary; and

Discount, rebate, pricing or other financial arrangements at the individual provider level between health care providers and health insurance entities, as defined in § 56-7-109, insurers, insurance arrangements and third party administrators that a proposer:

Submits to the state in response to a request for proposals or other procurement method after the notice of intended award of the contract is issued, where the proposer is the apparent contract awardee, in response to a request by the state for additional information; and

Explicitly marks as confidential and proprietary.

Information made confidential by subdivision (n)(1) shall be redacted wherever possible; and nothing contained in this subsection (n) shall be used to limit or deny access to otherwise public information because a file, document, or data file contains confidential information. The confidentiality established by subdivision (n)(1)(B) is applicable only to information submitted to the state after completion of the evaluation period; and provision of the notice of intended award of the contract and such information shall only be used to validate the accuracy of the apparent contract awardee's proposal and shall not be used to alter the scope of the information required by the state's procurement document requesting proposals. Any report produced by the state, or on the state's behalf, utilizing the information made confidential by subdivision (n)(1)(B) shall not be considered confidential hereunder so long as such report is disclosed in an aggregate or summary format without disclosing discount, rebate, pricing or other financial arrangements at the individual provider level.

The comptroller of the treasury, for the purpose of conducting audits or program evaluations, shall have access to the discount, rebate, pricing and descriptions of other financial arrangements cited in this subsection (n) as submitted in a procurement or as a report to the contractor; provided, however, that no official, employee or agent of the state of Tennessee may release or provide for the release, in any form, of information subject to confidential custody under this subsection (n).

Except as provided in subdivisions (o)(2)-(4), the following information and records are confidential, not open or available for public inspection and shall not be released in any manner:

All information contained in any application for a handgun carry permit issued pursuant to § 39-17-1351, § 39-17-1365, or § 39-17-1366, a permit renewal application, or contained in any materials required to be submitted in order to obtain such a permit;

All information provided to any state or federal agency, to any county, municipality, or other political subdivision, to any official, agent, or employee of any state or federal agency, or obtained by any state or federal agency in the course of its investigation of an applicant for a handgun carry permit; and

Any and all records maintained relative to an application for a handgun carry permit issued pursuant to § 39-17-1351, § 39-17-1365, or § 39-17-1366, a permit renewal application, the issuance, renewal, expiration, suspension, or revocation of a handgun carry permit, or the result of any criminal history record check conducted under this part.

Any information or other records regarding an applicant or permit holder may be released to a law enforcement agency for the purpose of conducting an investigation or prosecution, or for determining the validity of a handgun carry permit, or to a child support enforcement agency for purposes of child support enforcement, but shall not be publicly disclosed except as evidence in a criminal or child support enforcement proceeding.

Any person or entity may request the department of safety to search its handgun permit holder database to determine if a named person has a Tennessee handgun carry permit, as of the date of the request, if the person or entity presents with the request a judgment of conviction, criminal history report, order of protection, or other official government document or record that indicates the named person is not eligible to possess a handgun carry permit under the requirements of § 39-17-1351, § 39-17-1365, or § 39-17-1366.

Nothing in this subsection (o) shall prohibit release of the handgun carry permit statistical reports authorized by § 39-17-1351(s).

Information, records, and plans that are related to school security, the district-wide school safety plans or the building-level school safety plans shall not be open to public inspection. Nothing in this part shall be interpreted to prevent school administrators of an LEA from discussing or distributing information to parents or legal guardians of children attending the school regarding procedures for contacting or obtaining a child following a natural disaster.

Where a defendant has pled guilty to, or has been convicted of, and has been sentenced for a sexual offense or violent sexual offense specified in § 40-39-202, the following information regarding the victim of the offense shall be treated as confidential and shall not be open for inspection by members of the public:

Name, unless waived pursuant to subdivision (q)(2);

Home, work and electronic mail addresses;

Telephone numbers;

Social security number; and

Any photographic or video depiction of the victim.

At any time after the defendant or defendants in a case have been sentenced for an offense specified in subdivision (q)(1), the victim of such offense whose name is made confidential pursuant to subdivision (q)(1)(A) may waive such provision and allow the victim's name to be obtained in the same manner as other public records.

The district attorney general prosecuting the case shall notify the victim that the victim has the right to waive the confidentiality of the information set forth in subdivision (q)(1)(A).

If the victim executes a written waiver provided by the district attorney general's office to waive confidentiality pursuant to subdivision (q)(2)(A), the waiver shall be filed in the defendant's case file in the office of the court of competent jurisdiction.

Nothing in this subsection (q) shall prevent the district attorney general or attorney general and reporter and counsel for a defendant from providing to each other in a pending criminal case or appeal, where the constitutional rights of the defendant require it, information which otherwise may be held confidential under this subsection (q).

Nothing in this subsection (q) shall be used to limit or deny access to otherwise public information because a file, document, or data file contains some information made confidential by subdivision (q)(1); provided, that confidential information shall be redacted before any access is granted to a member of the public.

Nothing in this subsection (q) shall be construed to limit access to records by law enforcement agencies, courts, or other governmental agencies performing official functions.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, any bank account information that is received, compiled, or maintained by a state governmental agency, shall be confidential and shall not be an open record for inspection by members of the public. The bank account information that shall be kept confidential includes, but is not limited to, debit card numbers and any related personal identification numbers (PINs) or authorization codes, bank account numbers, and transit routing numbers.

The records of the insurance verification program created pursuant to the James Lee Atwood Jr. Law, compiled in title 55, chapter 12, part 2, in the possession of the department of revenue or its agent, the department of safety, the department of commerce and insurance, law enforcement, and the judiciary pursuant to the James Lee Atwood Jr. Law, shall be treated as confidential and shall not be open for inspection by members of the public. Subsection (c) shall not apply to the records described in this subsection (s).

The following information concerning the victim of a criminal offense who is a minor shall be treated as confidential and shall not be open for inspection by members of the public:

Name, unless waived pursuant to subdivision (t)(2);

Home, work, and electronic mail addresses;

Telephone numbers;

Social security number;

Any photographic or video depiction of the minor victim; and

Whether the defendant is related to the victim unless the relationship is an essential element of the offense.

The custodial parent or legal guardian of the minor victim of an offense whose name is made confidential pursuant to subdivision (t)(1)(A) may petition a court of record to waive confidentiality and allow the minor victim's name to be obtained in the same manner as other public records. Upon finding good cause shown, the court shall enter the order granting the waiver.

This subsection (t) shall not be construed to:

Restrict the application of Rule 16 of the Tennessee Rules of Criminal Procedure in any court or the disclosure of information required of counsel by the state or federal constitution;

Limit or deny access to otherwise public information because a file, document, or data file contains some information made confidential by subdivision (t)(1); provided, that confidential information shall be redacted before any access is granted to a member of the public;

Limit access to records by law enforcement agencies, courts, or other governmental agencies performing official functions;

Limit or prevent law enforcement from releasing information included in this subsection (t) for the purposes of locating and identifying missing, exploited, or abducted minors; or

Limit or prevent a political subdivision of this state from publicly releasing the name or photograph of the minor victim of a criminal offense for the purpose of memorializing minor victims of crime in a memorial garden established by the political subdivision, including any literature related to the memorial garden, if the custodial parent or legal guardian of the minor victim has consented to the release.

[Effective until July 1, 2022. See the Compiler's Notes.]

Video taken by a law enforcement body camera that depicts the following shall be treated as confidential and not subject to public inspection:

Minors, when taken within a school that serves any grades from kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12);

The interior of a facility licensed under title 33 or title 68; or

The interior of a private residence that is not being investigated as a crime scene.

Nothing in this subsection (u) shall prevent the district attorney general or attorney general and reporter and counsel for a defendant charged with a criminal offense from providing to each other in a pending criminal case or appeal, where the constitutional rights of the defendant require it, information which otherwise may be held confidential under this subsection (u).

Nothing in this subsection (u) shall be used to limit or deny access to otherwise public information because a file, document, or data file contains some information made confidential by subdivision (u)(1); provided, that confidential information shall be redacted before any access is granted to a member of the public.

Nothing in this subsection (u) shall be construed to limit access to records by law enforcement agencies, courts, or other governmental agencies performing official functions.

This subsection (u) is deleted on July 1, 2022, and shall no longer be effective on and after such date.
